Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.597

Play and learn groups—Resources and supports.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department, in consultation with community-based programs, shall provide or contract to provide, or both, resources and supports for inclusive and culturally and linguistically relevant play and learn groups. Play and learn groups offer parents and other caregivers culturally responsive opportunities to support their children's early learning, build relationships that reduce isolation and encourage socialization, and promote kindergarten readiness.

[ 2021 c 199 s 310.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.